Utah statutes.
53B-16-304.   Business confidentiality claims.

(1) (a)  Any person who provides to a public institution of higher education a record that the person believes should be protected under a provision listed in Subsection 63G-2-309(1)(b)(i), restricted under Section 53B-16-302, or both protected under a provision listed in Subsection 63G-2-309(1)(b)(i) and restricted under Section 53B-16-302, shall provide the public institution of higher education:

(i)  a written claim of business confidentiality; and

(ii)  a concise statement of reasons supporting the claim of business confidentiality.

(b)  The person described in Subsection (1)(a) shall make the filing at the commencement of:

(i)  the sponsored research project; or

(ii)  the technology transfer process.

(c)  A claim of business confidentiality submitted under this Subsection (1) shall cover all protected and restricted records exchanged during the:

(i)  sponsored research project; or

(ii)  technology transfer process.

(2)  The inadvertent failure to make a legally adequate claim of business confidentiality at the time required by Subsection (1) does not prejudice the claimant's right to make a legally adequate claim at a different time before disclosure of the record.

